Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 9

Interior Designers Title Registration Act

62-2-901. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Interior Designers Title Registration Act.”

Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 1997, ch. 33, validated the substitution of “registered interior designer” for “interior designer” throughout this chapter, as amended by Acts 1995, ch. 113, and made such language retroactive to April 19, 1995.

Attorney General Opinions. Interior design by non-registrants under T.C.A. §§ 62-2-101—62-2-906. OAG 12-46, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (4/3/12).

62-2-902. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the state board of examiners for architects and engineers; and

“Registered interior designer” means a person registered to use the title “registered interior designer” under this part. The registered interior designer is a person who meets the criteria of education, experience and examination as determined by the board.

Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 3; 1997, ch. 33, §§ 18, 19.

62-2-903. Use of title “registered interior designer.”

No person shall use the title “registered interior designer” unless the person is registered as provided in this part.

This part shall not prohibit any architect registered under parts 1-6 of this chapter from using the title of “registered interior designer.”

Nothing contained in this part shall prevent any person from rendering or offering to render interior design services; provided, that the person shall not be permitted to use or be identified by the title “registered interior designer” unless registered in accordance with this part.

Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 4; 1995, ch. 113, §§ 7-9.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 95-004, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/19/95).

Interior design by non-registrants under T.C.A. §§ 62-2-101—62-2-906. OAG 12-46, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (4/3/12).

62-2-904. Application for registration — Requirements — Examination.

Each applicant for registration shall apply to the board.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, each applicant shall take and pass the examination administered by the National Council for Interior Design Qualifications or an equivalent examination as specified by the board.

The applicant shall provide substantial evidence to the board that the applicant has passed the examination required by this part; and:

Is a graduate of a five-year interior design program from an accredited institution and has completed at least one (1) year of diversified interior design experience;

Is a graduate of a four-year interior design program from an accredited institution and has completed at least two (2) years of diversified interior design experience;

Is a graduate of a three-year interior design program from an accredited institution and has completed three (3) years of diversified interior design experience; or

Is a graduate of a two-year interior design program from an accredited institution and has completed four (4) years of diversified interior design experience.

All interior design programs must be accredited by the Foundation for Interior Design Education Research or a program determined by the board to be substantially equivalent to such a program; or an interior design program must be offered by an institution located in this state on April 16, 1991, and the institution is accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools or licensed by the Tennessee higher education commission.

An applicant for registration as a registered interior designer shall establish to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant:

Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age;

Has not been convicted of an offense that bears directly on the fitness of the applicant to be registered;

Has passed or supplied proof of passage of the examination required by this part; and

Meets any other requirements established by the board.

Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 5; 1993, ch. 58, § 1; 1995, ch. 113, §§ 6, 10.

62-2-905. Registration without examination — Requirements.

Any person who applies for registration and remits the application and initial registration fees prior to January 1, 1994, shall be registered by the board without taking the written examination; provided, that:

The applicant has satisfactory evidence of having used or been identified by the title “interior designer” and has:

Satisfactory interior design experience totaling six (6) years; or

A combination of interior design education and satisfactory interior design experience totaling six (6) years as follows:

A graduate of a four-year interior design program and two (2) years' experience;

A graduate of a three-year interior design program and three (3) years' experience; or

A graduate of a two-year interior design program and four (4) years' experience. The board shall determine if the two-year degree program meets the standards; and

A person shall be deemed to have used or been identified by the title “interior designer” within the meaning of this section if the person demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the person was, either on the person's own account, which means self-employed, or in the course of regular employment, rendering or offering to render to another person interior design services as defined in § 62-2-903, or was regularly engaged in the teaching of interior design at an accredited institution recognized by the board leading to a degree in interior design. Any combination of rendering services and teaching totaling six (6) years shall satisfy the requirements of this section.

Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 6.

62-2-906. Corporations, partnerships or firms — Use of title “interior designer” or “registered interior designer.”

A corporation, partnership or firm may use the title “registered interior designer;” provided, that at least one (1) of the principals or officers of the corporation, partnership or firm is in responsible charge of the practice and is registered as a registered interior designer under this chapter.

Any person, firm, company, business, corporation or other entity that was organized and doing business prior to April 16, 1991, and whose corporate name includes the appellation “interior design” may continue to use the corporate name and shall not be required to register pursuant to this chapter.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize persons employed by such entities to use the title “registered interior designer” unless the persons are registered pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1991, ch. 164, § 7; 1995, ch. 113, § 11; 1997, ch. 33, § 19.